Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63.2-1200.
Who may place children for adoption.

A child may be placed for adoption by:

A licensed child-placing agency;

A local board;

The child’s parent or legal guardian if the placement is a parental placement; and

Any agency outside the Commonwealth that is licensed or otherwise duly authorized to place children for adoption by virtue of the laws under which it operates.

History.

1978, c. 730, § 63.1-220.1; 1985, c. 285; 1989, c. 647; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.8; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 815; 2006, cc. 825, 848.

Cross references.

For requirement that the court be informed when in the course of an investigation upon receipt
of an adoption petition, it appears that there may have been a violation of §

63.2-1200

or §

63.2-1218

, see §

63.2-1208

. As to free public schools, see § 22.1-3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 830 enacted Chapter 10.2 of Title 63.1, §§ 63.1-219.7 through 63.1-219.55, and repealed Chapter 11 of Title 63.1, §§ 63.1-220 through 63.1-238.02.

Subsequently, Acts 2002, c. 747 enacted a new Title 63.2. The sections in Chapter 12 thereof were derived from Chapter 10.2 of Title 63.1, as enacted by Acts 2000, c. 830.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts 2013, c. 597, cl. 1, provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Social Services shall utilize all federal adoption bonus payments received by the Commonwealth in a fiscal year to support post-adoption services.”

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 815, in subdivision 4, added the language beginning “however, when any such agency” at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848, are identical, and in subdivision 4, deleted “however, when any such agency outside the Commonwealth, or its agent, executes an entrustment agreement in the Commonwealth with a birth parent for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities” from the end of the first sentence and the last sentence, which read: “Any entrustment agreement that fails to comply with such requirements shall be void.” Acts 2006, c. 848 took effect July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980).

For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

For comment on contemporary legal aspects of surrogate mother agreements, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 467 (1982).

For comment on Jane Doe v. John Doe,

222 Va. 736

, 284 S.E.2d 799 (1981) as to fitness of homosexuals as parents, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 851 (1982).

For article on recent developments in Virginia domestic relations law, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 507 (1982).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

for the year 1991, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 773 (1991).

for the year 1995, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1117 (1995).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

Research References.

Adoption Law and Practice (Matthew Bender). Hollander.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Courts. § 1.03 Court of Appeals. Chapter 39A Interlocutory Appeals. § 39A.01 Interlocutory Appeal Statute. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-300 Checklist for Agency Adoption, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 20.1; 5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 76, 77; 14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, § 5.5A M.J. Courts, § 36.1; 15 M.J. Public Officers, § 46.

§ 63.2-1200.1.
Recognition of foreign adoption; issuance of birth certificates.

Any adoption of a child who was born in a foreign country and who was not a citizen of the United States at the time of birth shall, subject to the provisions of subsection D of §

63.2-1201.1

, be recognized by the Commonwealth and the rights and obligations of the parties shall be determined as though the order of adoption was entered by a court of the Commonwealth if the adoption was finalized pursuant to the laws of the country from which the child was adopted, and the child was admitted to the United States with an IR-3 or IH-3 visa issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. In such cases, the adoptive parents shall not be required to readopt the child in Virginia.

In cases in which an adoption of a child was finalized pursuant to the laws of a foreign country and the child was admitted to the United States with an IR-3 or IH-3 visa, the adoptive parents, if residents of the Commonwealth at the time the adoption was finalized, may submit a report of adoption to the State Registrar of Vital Records on a form furnished by the State Registrar, which shall (i) include evidence as to the date, place of birth, and parentage of the adopted person; (ii) provide information necessary to establish a new certificate of birth for the adopted person; (iii) include a certified or notarized copy of the final order of adoption entered by the foreign court, together with a certified translation or a notarized copy of a certified translation of the final order of adoption in cases in which the original order is not in English; and (iv) include an affidavit from the adoptive parents indicating that they are receiving supervision from a licensed or approved child-placing agency in the United States or have received supervision from a licensed or approved child-placing agency in the United States and have satisfied all post-adoption requirements as required by the foreign country from which the child was adopted. Upon receipt of a report pursuant to this subsection, the State Registrar shall establish a new certificate of birth for the adopted person, and such certificate of birth shall be registered in accordance with the provisions of §

32.1-261

.

History.

2011, c. 486; 2012, c. 323.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 323, in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “if residents of the Commonwealth at the time the adoption was finalized” in the introductory clause, substituted “certified or notarized copy” for “certified copy” and “certified translation or a notarized copy of a certified translation” for “certified translation” in clause (iii), and inserted “or have received supervision from a licensed or approved child-placing agency in the United States and have satisfied all post-adoption requirements as required by the foreign country from which the child was adopted” at the end of clause (iv).

§ 63.2-1201.
Filing of petition for adoption; venue; jurisdiction; and proceedings.

Proceedings for the adoption of a minor child and for a change of name of such child shall be instituted only by petition to a circuit court in the county or city in which the petitioner resides, in the county or city in which the child-placing agency that placed the child is located, or in the county or city in which a birth parent executed a consent pursuant to §

63.2-1233

. Such petition may be filed by any natural person who resides in the Commonwealth, or who has custody of a child placed by a child-placing agency of the Commonwealth, or by an adopting parent of a child who was subject to a consent proceeding held pursuant to §

63.2-1233

, or by intended parents who are parties to a surrogacy contract. The petition shall ask leave to adopt a minor child not legally the petitioner’s by birth and, if it is so desired by the petitioner, also to change the name of such child. In the case of married persons, or persons who were previously married who are permitted to adopt a child under §

63.2-1201.1

, the petition shall be the joint petition of the husband and wife or former spouses but, in the event the child to be adopted is legally the child by birth or adoption of one of the petitioners, such petitioner shall unite in the petition for the purpose of indicating consent to the prayer thereof only. If any procedural provision of this chapter applies to only one of the adoptive parents, then the court may waive the application of the procedural provision for the spouse of the adoptive parent to whom the provision applies. The petition shall contain a full disclosure of the circumstances under which the child came to live, and is living, in the home of the petitioner. Each petition for adoption shall be signed by the petitioner as well as by counsel of record, if any. In any case in which the petition seeks the entry of an adoption order without referral for investigation, the petition shall be under oath.

A single petition for adoption under the provisions of this section shall be sufficient for the concurrent adoption by the same petitioners of two or more children who have the same birth parent or parents, and nothing in this section shall be construed as having heretofore required a separate petition for each of such children.

The petition for adoption, except those filed pursuant to subdivisions 4 and 5 of §

63.2-1210

, shall include an additional $50 filing fee that shall be used to fund the Virginia Birth Father Registry established in Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of this chapter.

A petition filed while the child is under 18 years of age shall not become invalid because the child reaches 18 years of age prior to the entry of a final order of adoption. Any final order of adoption entered pursuant to §

63.2-1213

after a child reaches 18 years of age, where the petition was filed prior to the child turning 18 years of age, shall have the same effect as if the child was under 18 years of age at the time the order was entered by the circuit court provided the court has obtained the consent of the adoptee.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348; 1952, c. 550; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1964, c. 459; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-221; 1970, c. 672; 1973, c. 406; 1975, c. 461; 1978, c. 730; 1983, c. 614; 1988, c. 882; 1989, c. 647; 1991, cc. 76, 602; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.9; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2008, cc. 116, 868; 2009, c. 805; 2017, c. 200; 2022, c. 377.

Cross references.

As to fees collected by clerks of circuit courts generally, see §

17.1-275

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “the” for “is located the” and inserted the language beginning “is located, or in the county” to the end, divided the former second sentence into the second and third sentences by inserting “The petition shall ask” preceding “leave to adopt a minor”; substituted the language beginning “or by an adopting parent” to the end of the second sentence for “for”; and substituted “the petitioner’s” for “his” in the third sentence.

The 2006 amendment by c. 825 also added the last paragraph, effective July 1, 2007. Acts 2006, c. 848, was effective July 1, 2006.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and added the fifth sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 116 added the last paragraph.

The 2008 amendment by c. 868 inserted “or persons who were previously married who are permitted to adopt a child under §

63.2-1201.1

” in the fourth sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805, in the first paragraph, in the fifth sentence, substituted “of the adoptive parents” for “adoptive parent,” “for the spouse” for “as to the spouse” and inserted “to whom the provision applies.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” in the third paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 substituted “subdivisions 4 and 5” for “subdivisions 5 and 6” in the third paragraph.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Venue. § 3.02 Statutory Rules of Venue. Friend.

§ 63.2-1201.1.
Previously married persons who stood in loco parentis during the time of the marriage may adopt in the same manner as married persons.

A man and woman previously married to each other who stood in loco parentis to a child during their marriage to each other, and who could have adopted or readopted the child pursuant to this chapter while married to each other, but whose marriage is void, has been annulled or has dissolved, may adopt or readopt the child pursuant to the provisions in this chapter that are applicable to married persons.

An individual previously married to a parent of a child by birth or adoption, and who stood in loco parentis to that child during the marriage, and who could have adopted the child pursuant to §

63.2-1241

during the marriage, may, with the consent of the prior spouse who is a parent of the child by birth or adoption, adopt the child, after the marriage has been dissolved, annulled or voided, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter that are applicable to step-parents.

Any person or persons seeking to adopt or readopt pursuant to this section may be permitted to do so even if they have remarried.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any child to have more than two living parents by birth or adoption, who have legal rights and obligations in respect to the child, in the form of one father and one mother.

History.

2008, c. 868.

§ 63.2-1202.
Parental, or agency, consent required; exceptions.

No petition for adoption shall be granted, except as hereinafter provided in this section, unless written consent to the proposed adoption is filed with the petition. Such consent shall be in writing, signed under oath and acknowledged before an officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments. The consent of a birth parent for the adoption of his child placed directly by the birth parent shall be executed as provided in §

63.2-1233

, and the circuit court may accept a certified copy of an order entered pursuant to §

63.2-1233

in satisfaction of all requirements of this section, provided the order clearly evidences compliance with the applicable notice and consent requirements of §

63.2-1233

.

A birth parent who has not reached the age of 18 shall have legal capacity to give consent to adoption and perform all acts related to adoption, and shall be as fully bound thereby as if the birth parent had attained the age of 18 years.

Consent shall be executed:

By the birth mother and by any man who:

Is an acknowledged father under §

20-49.1

;

Is an adjudicated father under §

20-49.8

;

Is a presumed father under subsection D; or

Has registered with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.).Verification of compliance with the notice provisions of the Virginia Birth Father Registry shall be provided to the court.

A man shall be presumed to be the father of a child if:

He and the mother of the child are married to each other and the child is born during the marriage;

He and the mother of the child were married to each other and the child is born within 300 days of their date of separation, as evidenced by a written agreement or decree of separation, or within 300 days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce; or

Before the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with the law, even if the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the invalid marriage or within 300 days of their date of separation, as evidenced by a written agreement or decree of separation, or within 300 days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce.Such presumption may be rebutted by sufficient evidence that would establish by a preponderance of the evidence the paternity of another man or the impossibility or improbability of cohabitation with the birth mother for a period of at least 300 days prior to the birth of the child.

No consent shall be required of a birth father if he denies under oath and in writing the paternity of the child. Such denial of paternity may be withdrawn no more than 10 days after it is executed. Once the child is 10 days old, any executed denial of paternity is final and constitutes a waiver of all rights with respect to the adoption of the child and cannot be withdrawn.

No consent shall be required of the birth father of a child when the birth father is convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

, subsection B of §

18.2-366

, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, and the child was conceived as a result of such violation.

No notice or consent shall be required of any person whose parental rights have been terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction, including foreign courts that have competent jurisdiction. No notice or consent is required of any birth parent of a child for whom a guardianship order was granted when the child was approved by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services for purposes of adoption.

No consent shall be required of a birth parent who, without just cause, has neither visited nor contacted the child for a period of six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition for adoption or the filing of a petition to accept consent to an adoption. The prospective adoptive parent(s) shall establish by clear and convincing evidence that the birth parent(s), without just cause, has neither visited nor contacted the child for a period of six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition for adoption or the filing of a petition to accept consent to an adoption. This provision shall not infringe upon the birth parent’s right to be noticed and heard on the allegation of abandonment. For purposes of this section, the payment of child support, in the absence of other contact with the child, shall not be considered contact.

A birth father of the child may consent to the termination of all of his parental rights prior to the birth of the child.

The failure of the nonconsenting party to appear at any scheduled hearing, either in person or by counsel, after proper notice has been given to said party, shall constitute a waiver of any objection and right to consent to the adoption.

If a birth parent, legal guardian, or prospective adoptee, executing a consent, entrustment, or other documents related to the adoption, cannot provide the identification required pursuant to §

47.1-14

, the birth parent, legal guardian, or prospective adoptee may execute a self-authenticating affidavit as to his identity subject to the penalties contained in §

63.2-1217

.

A legal custodian of a child being placed for adoption, and any other named parties in pending cases in which the custody or visitation of such child is at issue, whether such case is in a circuit or district court, shall be entitled to proper notice of any adoption proceeding and an opportunity to be heard.

2.

By the child-placing agency or the local board having custody of the child, with right to place him for adoption, through court commitment or parental agreement as provided in §

63.2-900

,

63.2-903

, or

63.2-1221

; or an agency outside the Commonwealth that is licensed or otherwise duly authorized to place children for adoption by virtue of the laws under which it operates; and

3.

By the child if he is 14 years of age or older, unless the circuit court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by not requiring such consent.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-351; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1960, c. 331; 1962, c. 603; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-225; 1972, cc. 73, 475, 823; 1974, c. 620; 1978, cc. 730, 735, 744; 1985, c. 18; 1986, c. 387; 1989, c. 647; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.10; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 890; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2009, c. 805; 2011, c. 486; 2012, c. 424; 2017, c. 200; 2020, c. 3.

Cross references.

As to identification of reports required by §

63.2-1208

and §

63.2-1212

with child’s name, birth registration number, and name by which the child is to be known after adoption, see §

63.2-1227

.

As to foster parent adoption, see §

63.2-1229

.

As to approval of entrustment agreements, see § 16.1-277.01.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted “or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction” in subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848, in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A, inserted “in writing” and “under oath”; inserted “perform all acts related to adoption, and” in subsection B; added subsection C; redesignated former subsections C, D and E as subsections D, F and G and rewrote subsections D and G; and added subsections E and H through J. Subdivisions C 2, C 3, D 1 d and D 1 e, as amended by c. 825 also contain references to the Putative Father Registry, effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and transferred former subsection C to subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection C and substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C”; deleted former subdivision D 1 e regarding unregistered putative fathers, and added the undesignated paragraph following subdivision C 1; in subsection G, inserted “including foreign courts that have competent jurisdiction” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; deleted “not married to the mother” in subsection I; substituted “any” for “the” preceding “scheduled” in subsection J and added subsection K.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 added the present last sentence of subsection H.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 486, in subsection G, deleted “whose adoption was finalized in a foreign country or” following “birth parent of a child.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 424, in subsection H, substituted “for a period of six months immediately prior to the filing of the petition for adoption or the filing of a petition to accept consent to an adoption” for “for a period of six prior to the filing of the petition for adoption” in the first and second sentences; and in subsection K, substituted “birth parent, legal guardian, or prospective adoptee, executing a consent” for “birth parent or legal guardian, executing a consent” and “birth parent, legal guardian, or prospective adoptee may execute” for “birth parent may execute” in subsection K; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” twice in subdivision C 1 d.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 3 added subsection L.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, §§ 8, 11.

§ 63.2-1203.
When consent is withheld or unobtainable.

If, after consideration of the evidence, the circuit court finds that the valid consent of any person or agency whose consent is required is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child as set forth in §

63.2-1205

, or is unobtainable, the circuit court may grant the petition without such consent:

Fifteen days after personal service of notice of petition on the party or parties whose consent is required by this section;

If personal service is unobtainable, 10 days after the completion of the execution of an order of publication against the party or parties whose consent is required by this section concerning the petition;

If a birth parent is deceased, upon the filing of a death certificate for a deceased birth parent with the court; or

If the judge certifies on the record that the identity of any person whose consent is hereinabove required is not reasonably ascertainable.An affidavit of the birth mother that the identity of the birth father is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided there is no other evidence before the circuit court that would refute such an affidavit. The absence of such an affidavit shall not be deemed evidence that the identity of the birth father is reasonably ascertainable. For purposes of determining whether the identity of the birth father is reasonably ascertainable, the standard of what is reasonable under the circumstances shall control, taking into account the relative interests of the child, the birth mother and the birth father.

If the child is not in the custody of a child-placing agency and both parents are deceased, the circuit court, after hearing evidence to that effect, may grant the petition without the filing of any consent.

In an adoption proceeding where the consent of a birth parent is required, but the petition for adoption alleges that the birth parent is withholding consent to the adoption, the court shall provide written notice to the birth parent of his right to be represented by counsel prior to any hearing or decision on the petition. Upon request, the court shall appoint counsel for any such birth parent if such parent has been determined to be indigent by the court pursuant to §

19.2-159

.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-351; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1960, c. 331; 1962, c. 603; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-225; 1972, cc. 73, 475, 823; 1974, c. 620; 1978, cc. 730, 735, 744; 1985, c. 18; 1986, c. 387; 1989, c. 647; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.11; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 805; 2012, c. 425.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805, in subdivision A 1, substituted “Fifteen days” for “Twenty-one days”; added present subdivision A 3; redesignated former subdivision A 3 as present subdivision A 4 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 425 added subsection C, and made a minor stylistic change in subdivision A 2.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 27.

§ 63.2-1204.
When consent is revocable; fraud or duress; mutual consent.

Parental consent to an adoption or an entrustment agreement not yet finalized by the court, shall be revocable prior to the final order of adoption (i) upon proof of fraud or duress or (ii) after placement of the child in an adoptive home, upon written, mutual consent of the birth parents and prospective adoptive parents or the child-placing agency.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-351; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1960, c. 331; 1962, c. 603; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-225; 1972, cc. 73, 475, 823; 1974, c. 620; 1978, cc. 730, 735, 744; 1985, c. 18; 1986, c. 387; 1989, c. 647; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.12; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 inserted “or an entrustment agreement not yet finalized by the court” and “or the child-placing agency.”

§ 63.2-1205.
Best interests of the child; standards for determining.

In determining whether the valid consent of any person whose consent is required is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, or is unobtainable, the circuit court or juvenile and domestic relations district court, as the case may be, shall consider whether granting the petition pending before it would be in the best interest of the child. The circuit court or juvenile and domestic relations district court, as the case may be, shall consider all relevant factors, including the birth parent(s)’ efforts to obtain or maintain legal and physical custody of the child; whether the birth parent(s) are currently willing and able to assume full custody of the child; whether the birth parent(s)’ efforts to assert parental rights were thwarted by other people; the birth parent(s)’ ability to care for the child; the age of the child; the quality of any previous relationship between the birth parent(s) and the child and between the birth parent(s) and any other minor children; the duration and suitability of the child’s present custodial environment; and the effect of a change of physical custody on the child.

History.

1995, cc. 772, 826, § 63.1-225.1; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.13; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 467; 2006, cc. 825, 848.

Cross references.

As to granting of adoption petition without parental consent when the court finds that consent is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, see §

63.2-1203

.

As to execution of consent for parental placement adoptions, and exceptions to consent requirements, see §

63.2-1233

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 twice inserted “circuit court or,” and twice inserted “as the case may be.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “granting” for “the failure to grant” and “in the best interest of” for “detrimental to,” and in the last sentence, substituted “The” for “In determining whether the failure to grant the petition would be detrimental to the child, the” and inserted “whether the birth parent(s) are currently willing and able to assume full custody of the child.” Acts 2006, c. 848, is effective July 1, 2006. For effective date of Acts 2006, c. 825, see Editor’s notes.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 27.

§ 63.2-1205.1.
Certain offenders prohibited from adopting a child.

No petition for adoption shall be granted if the person seeking to adopt has been convicted of an offense requiring registration pursuant to §

9.1-902

.

History.

2006, c. 384; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “a sexually violent offense or” preceding “an offense.”

§ 63.2-1206.
No parental presumption after revocation period expires.

If, after the expiration of the appropriate revocation period provided for in §

63.2-1223

or §

63.2-1234

, a birth parent or an alleged birth parent attempts to obtain or regain custody of or attempts to exercise parental rights to a child who has been placed for adoption, there shall be no parental presumption in favor of any party. Upon the motion of any such birth parent or alleged birth parent, or upon the motion of any person or agency with whom the child has been placed, the circuit or juvenile and domestic relations district court, as the case may be, shall determine (i) whether the birth parent or alleged birth parent is a person whose consent to the adoption is required and, if so, then (ii) pursuant to §

63.2-1205

, whether, in the best interest of the child, the consent of the person whose consent is required is being withheld contrary to the best interest of the child or is unobtainable.

History.

1995, cc. 772, 826, § 63.1-220.7; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.14; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 467.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 inserted “as the case may be” in the last sentence.

§ 63.2-1207.
Removal of child from adoptive home.

When a child is placed in an adoptive home pursuant to an adoptive home placement agreement by a local board or by a licensed child-placing agency pursuant to §

63.2-1221

, or by the birth parent or legal guardian of the child pursuant to §

63.2-1230

, and a circuit court of competent jurisdiction has not entered an interlocutory order of adoption, such child shall not be removed from the physical custody of the adoptive parents, except (i) with the consent of the adoptive parents; (ii) upon order of the juvenile and domestic relations district court or the circuit court of competent jurisdiction; (iii) pursuant to §

63.2-904

, which removal shall be subject to review by the juvenile and domestic relations district court upon petition of the adoptive parents; or (iv) upon order of the juvenile and domestic relations district court that accepted consent when consent has been revoked as authorized by §

63.2-1204

or §

63.2-1223

.

When a child has been placed in an adoptive home directly by the birth parents or legal guardian of the child, the adoptive parents have been granted custody of the child pursuant to §

63.2-1233

, and it becomes necessary to remove the child from the home of the adoptive parents, the juvenile and domestic relations district court entering such an order shall order that any consent given for the purposes of such placement shall be void and shall determine the custody of the child.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.5; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.15; 2002, c. 747.